Utah statutes.
26-10-5.   Plan for school health services.

The department shall establish a plan for school health services for pupils in elementary and secondary schools. The department shall cooperate with the state office of education and local health departments in developing such plan and shall coordinate activities between these agencies. The plan may provide for the delivery of health services by and through intermediate and local school districts and local health departments.

